Wisconsin, session 2025, SB720.
do enact as follows:SB720,13Section 1. Fiscal changes.SB720,2,44(1) Veterans cemetery caretaker positions. In the schedule under s. 520.005 (3) for the appropriation to the department of veterans affairs under s. 120.485 (4) (q), the dollar amount for fiscal year 2025-26 is increased by $131,800 2and the dollar amount for fiscal year 2026-27 is increased by $170,800 to increase 3the number of authorized FTE positions in the department of veterans affairs by 43.0 SEG positions for the purpose of caring for the 3 state veterans cemeteries.SB720,2,55